Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1.

Tennessee Trails System Act.

11-11-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Trails System Act.”

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1601.

11-11-102. Trail system authorized — Purpose of chapter.

In order to provide for the ever increasing outdoor recreation needs of an expanded population and in order to promote public access to, travel within, and enjoyment and appreciation of the outdoor, natural and remote areas of the state, trails should be established:

In natural, scenic areas of the state; and

In and near urban areas.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide the means for attaining these objectives by instituting a state system of scenic and recreation trails, by designating certain trails as the initial components of that system, and by prescribing the methods by which, and standards according to which, additional components may be added to the system.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 2; T.C.A., § 11-1602.

11-11-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation;

“Conservation easement” means a conservation easement as defined in § 66-9-303;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Political subdivision” means any county, any incorporated city or town, or other political subdivision; and

“System” means the “Tennessee trails system” as established in this chapter and including all trails and trail segments, together with their rights-of-way, whether initially designated or later added by any of the procedures described in the chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 3; T.C.A., § 11-1603; Acts 1981, ch. 361, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1981, ch. 361, which amended this section, provided in § 14 of the act that the provisions of the act shall not affect any easement entered into prior to July 1, 1981, nor any rights, privileges or duties pursuant to such easements. See also § 66-9-309.

11-11-104. Composition of system.

The system shall be composed of:

State scenic trails, which will be extended trails so located as to provide maximum potential for the appreciation of natural areas and for the conservation and enjoyment of the significant scenic, historic, natural, ecological, geological or cultural qualities of the areas through which such trails may pass. Each of these trails will be limited exclusively to foot use, except that the use by horses or nonmotorized bicycles may also be permitted on segments of scenic trails where deemed appropriate by the department. Because of their extended length, the state scenic trails shall be supplemented by support facilities located only on that part of a trail which is in a state park, recreation area or wildlife management area. Such support facilities may include, where deemed necessary and feasible, primitive shelters, fireplaces, safe water supply, and other related public use facilities. These facilities shall concur with department standards. No open wood fires shall be permitted on state scenic trails except in areas with support facilities specifically designated for such purpose;

State recreation trails, which will provide a variety of outdoor recreation uses in or reasonably accessible to urban areas. These trails may be of the following types:

Foot;

Horse; or

Nonmotorized bicycles; and

Connecting or side trails, which will provide additional points of public access to state recreation or state scenic trails or which will provide connections between such trails. They shall be of the nature of the trails they serve.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 4; T.C.A., § 11-1604.

11-11-105. Criteria for trails.

Criteria for establishing the different classes of trails named in § 11-11-104 shall be as follows:

State scenic trails shall traverse mostly scenic and natural areas and shall be of sufficient length that they cannot be traveled in one (1) day or less. Scenic trails shall be narrow paths causing the minimum disturbance to the natural environment, and shall be restricted to foot travel, with all other modes of locomotion prohibited, except as set forth in §§ 11-11-104(1) and 11-11-114; and

Horse and bicycle trails shall have a surface and overhead clearance appropriate for their designated mode of locomotion. Motorized vehicles of any kind shall be barred from foot, horse, and bicycle trails, except as set forth in § 11-11-114.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 5; T.C.A., § 11-1605.

11-11-106. Initial components.

The following trails shall be included as an initial component of the Tennessee trails system, as a state scenic trail:

The Appalachian Trail, that portion as recorded in the federal register, running descriptively from the Virginia state line southeast to U. S. Route 19E in the vicinity of the Tennessee-North Carolina state line to Doe Knob in the Great Smoky Mountains;

The Cumberland Trail, running roughly from the Tennessee state line near Marion and Hamilton counties to Cumberland Gap, following the scenic mountains, gorges, and escarpments of the Cumberland as the route is determined by the department;

The Trail of Tears, running roughly from south of Cleveland near Red Clay to and crossing the Hiwassee River, then crossing the Tennessee River, intersecting the Cumberland Trail and passing through Fall Creek Falls State Park, continuing on to Cedars of Lebanon State Park and thence northwestward to Paris Landing State Park as the route is determined by the department;

The John Muir Trail, running roughly from the mouth of Wolf River in Fentress County joining Pickett State Park and continuing south along the scenic south fork of the Cumberland River to Frozen Head State Park, formerly known as Morgan State Forest, intersecting the Cumberland Trail and thence southeastward to the Hiwassee Scenic River, thence to the North Carolina line as the route is determined by the department;

The Trail of the Lonesome Pine, beginning near Corryton in Knox County, thence running roughly the entire length, northeastward, of Grainger and Hawkins counties, following closely the scenic gorges and escarpments of the Clinch Mountain range as the route is determined by the department;

The Chickasaw Bluffs Trail, running roughly from T.O. Fuller State Park south of Memphis to the proposed Fort Pillow State Park in Lauderdale County and continuing northward to terminate at Reelfoot Lake State Park, following the scenic floodplains and bluffs of the Mississippi River as the route is determined by the department;

The Natchez Trace, following the Natchez Trace Parkway from the Tennessee state line in Wayne County to Nashville in the vicinity of Tennessee State Route 100 as the route is determined by the department. The Natchez Trace shall include both foot and horse trails; and

The Overmountain Victory Trail, that portion lying within the boundaries of this state, generally following the route traveled by the “overmountain men” in their journey from Sycamore Shoals across the Appalachian Mountains to the site of the Kings Mountain battlefield in South Carolina. In order to ensure completion of this trail outside Tennessee, the commissioner shall work directly with officials of the states of North Carolina and South Carolina to encourage them to develop that portion of the route of the Overmountain Victory Trail within their respective states.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 6; 1976, ch. 483, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1606.

Compiler's Notes. For an Order creating the Justin P. Wilson - Cumberland Trail State Park, see Executive Order No. 33 (July 31, 2002).

11-11-107. Establishment of scenic or recreation trails.

State scenic trails shall be authorized and designated only by an act of the general assembly.

The department may establish and designate state recreation trails on lands administered by the department; and/or on lands under the jurisdiction of a state department, political subdivision, or private lands providing:

Such trails are reasonably accessible to urban areas;

Such trails meet the criteria established in this chapter and such supplementary criteria as may be prescribed; and/or

Fee simple, conservation easements or other rights are obtained from a private landowner through which a state recreation trail may pass. The department may establish and designate state recreation trails on lands under the jurisdiction of a federal agency, when in the opinion of the federal agency and the commissioner such lands may be so developed under federal law and subdivisions (b)(1) and (2).

As provided in this section, trails within park, forest, recreation areas, state natural areas, or any other public area may be established and designated as “state recreation trails” by the department.

Connecting or side trails within park, forest, recreation area or natural area may be established, designated, and marked as components of a state recreation or state scenic trail.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 7; T.C.A., § 11-1607; Acts 1981, ch. 361, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1981, ch. 361, which amended this section, provided in § 14 of the act that the provisions of the act shall not affect any easement entered into prior to July 1, 1981, nor any rights, privileges or duties pursuant to such easements. See also § 66-9-309.

11-11-108. Proposals for establishing trails.

The commissioner shall study and, from time to time, submit to the governor and to the general assembly proposals for additions to the state scenic trails system, as well as reports on state recreation trails that have been designated by the department, regarding rights-of-way that have been established and on the program for implementing this chapter. Each proposal shall include a short statement on the significance of the various trails to the system.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 8; T.C.A., § 11-1608.

11-11-109. Locating routes of trails.

The process of locating routes of trails initially included in, as well as trails to be added to, the system shall be as follows:

For state scenic trails, the department shall select a route. The selected route shall be compatible with preservation or enhancement of the environment it traverses. Reasonable effort shall be made to minimize any adverse effects upon adjacent landowners and users. Notice of the selected route shall be published by the department in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the trail is located, together with appropriate maps and descriptions. Such publication shall be prior to the recommendation by the department to the general assembly;

For state recreation trails and for connecting or side trails, the department shall select the route; provided, that when a route traverses land within the jurisdiction of a governmental unit or political subdivision, the department shall consult with such unit or such subdivision prior to its final determination for the location of the route;

In selecting routes and implementing this chapter, the department is encouraged to confer with the recognized and established organizations primarily interested in trail development, conservation and outdoor recreation, it being the intent of this section to recognize the efforts and work already completed on such scenic trails as the Appalachian and Cumberland trails by such organizations. Furthermore, the general assembly encourages citizen participation in trail acquisition, construction, development, and maintenance where such activities will not conflict with the purpose of this chapter; and

In the selection of the route for any trails, when the trail reaches an area of crop or fenced pasture land, the trail shall be so located as not to interfere in the growing of crops or with the livestock or pasture land and such trail may then follow existing farm roads. The owner of such farmlands may enter a written agreement with the department to grant permission for the crossing of such crop or pasture land.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 9; T.C.A., § 11-1609.

11-11-110. Reports of other agencies on activities that may affect trails.

All state agencies shall, promptly upon enactment of this chapter, inform the commissioner of any proceedings, studies, or other activities within their jurisdiction, and regardless of by whom requested, which are now in progress and which affect or may affect any of the trails specified in § 11-11-106. They shall likewise inform the commissioner of any such proceedings, studies or other activities which are hereafter commenced or resumed before they are commenced or resumed and that may affect any initial component of, or later addition to, the system.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 10; T.C.A., § 11-1610.

11-11-111. Consideration of abandoned rights-of-way — Establishment of trail right-of-way boundaries.

The department shall review all formal declarations of railroad right-of-way abandonments by the interstate commerce commission, for possible inclusion into the state trails system. The commissioner shall, within three (3) years after the route of a trail or trail segment included in the system has been located, determine the boundaries of the right-of-way to be associated with that trail. Such boundaries shall be established in such a manner that they protect the scenic value of the trail.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 11; T.C.A., § 11-1611.

11-11-112. Acquisition of property.

Within the exterior boundaries of the right-of-way, the commissioner may acquire, on behalf of the state of Tennessee, lands in fee title, or interest in land in the form of conservation easements or cooperative agreements. Acquisition of land or of interest therein may be by gift, purchase with donated funds or funds appropriated by the general assembly, proceeds from the sale of bonds, exchange, assumption of property tax payments, or otherwise. Acquisition of land or interest therein shall be accomplished with all possible speed. In acquiring real property or the property interest therein, as defined in this section, the power of eminent domain shall not be utilized to acquire a fee simple or lessor interests to more than twenty-five (25) acres in any one (1) mile of trail length. Such power shall not be used to acquire crop or fenced pasture land when such acquisition will interfere with the growing of crops or with the livestock or pasture land on the remaining property of the farm owner.

The power of eminent domain shall not be utilized for acquisitions in the Chickasaw Bluffs Trail area, as defined in § 11-11-106.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 12; 1976, ch. 469, § 1; T.C.A., § 11-1612; Acts 1981, ch. 361, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1981, ch. 361, which amended this section, provided in § 14 of the act that the provisions of the act shall not affect any easement entered into prior to July 1, 1981, nor any rights, privileges or duties pursuant to such easements. See also § 66-9-309.

11-11-113. Use of right-of-way — Hunting restricted.

Within the external boundaries of the right-of-way, the natural vegetation shall be kept undisturbed except for any clearing required for construction of the trail, occasional vistas, or trail-use facilities described in § 11-11-117. The department shall make every effort to avoid any use of the right-of-way that is incompatible with the purposes for which the trails were established. Development and management of each segment of the state trails system shall be designed to harmonize with and complement any established multiple-use plans for that specific area in order to ensure continual maximum benefits from the land. Other uses along the trail which will not substantially interfere with the nature and purposes of the trail may be permitted by the department.

No hunting of wild game shall be permitted on or along any section of the system except as authorized by the department; provided, that the owner of real property adjacent to any part of the system may hunt with or without department authorization on that portion of the system which is adjacent to such owner's property.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 13; T.C.A., § 11-1613.

11-11-114. Motorized vehicles prohibited — Exceptions — Prosecution for violations.

The use of motorized vehicles by the general public within the right-of-way of any state scenic or recreation trail shall be prohibited, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the use of motorized vehicles in these rights-of-way.

The department shall establish regulations which shall authorize the use of motorized vehicles when such vehicles are required to meet emergencies where life or health is at risk, or to enable present or adjacent landowners or land users to have access to their lands or timber rights where no reasonable alternative method of access exists or could be constructed.

Prosecution for violation of this section may be initiated by a peace officer who witnessed an offense in violation of this section or by any private citizen who witnessed any violation of this section who is willing to make the initial charge and testify for the state.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 14; T.C.A., § 11-1614.

11-11-115. Application of law to area becoming part of a park or other state system.

Any component of the system that is or shall become a part of any state park, recreation area, wildlife management area, or similar area shall be subject to this chapter and the laws under which the other areas are administered, and, in the case of conflict between these laws, the more restrictive provisions shall apply.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 15; T.C.A., § 11-1615.

11-11-116. Signs and markers.

The department, in consultation with appropriate governmental agencies, and public and private organizations shall establish a uniform marker for trails contained in the system. An additional appropriate symbol characterizing specific trails may be included on the marker. The markers shall be placed at all access points, together with signs indicating the modes of locomotion that are prohibited for the trail. Where the trail constitutes a portion of a national scenic trail, use of the national scenic trail uniform marker shall be considered sufficient. The route of the trail and the boundaries of the right-of-way shall be marked with paint or other simple means.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 16; T.C.A., § 11-1616.

11-11-117. Administration of system — Maintenance.

The Tennessee trail system shall be administered by the department according to the policies and criteria set forth in this chapter.

The department shall, in addition, have or designate the responsibility for maintaining the trails, building bridges, campsites, shelters, and related public-use facilities where required.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 17; T.C.A., § 11-1617.

11-11-118. Relocation procedure.

Segments of the state trails may be relocated when such relocation is deemed necessary to preserve or enhance the values for which the trail was established.

Relocation may be accomplished by the department after consultation with other governmental agencies involved, and following publication of notice in a newspaper of general circulation, together with maps and descriptions.

In establishing the new location and right-of-way, the procedures set forth in §§ 11-11-109 — 11-11-113 shall be followed.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 18; T.C.A., § 11-1618.

11-11-119. State trails as part of national system.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a component of the state trails system from becoming a part of the national trails system.

The commissioner shall coordinate the state trails system with the national trails system and is directed to encourage and assist any federal studies for inclusion of Tennessee trails in the national trails system.

The commissioner may enter into written cooperative agreements for joint federal-state administration of a Tennessee component of the national trails system; provided, that such agreements for administration of land uses are not less restrictive than those set forth in this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 19; T.C.A., § 11-1619.

11-11-120. Violations — Compelling compliance — Penalties.

Whoever violates, fails, neglects or refuses to obey any provision of this chapter, or regulation or order of the commissioner may be compelled to comply with or obey the same by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate remedy.

Whoever violates, fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any of this chapter or regulation or order of the commissioner may be punished by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day of such violation.

Acts 1971, ch. 103, § 20; T.C.A., § 11-1620.